Colorado, session 2026A, SB056.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 39-22-104, amend
(3)(u) as follows:
39-22-104. Income tax imposed on individuals, estates, and
trusts - single rate - report - tax preference performance statement
- legislative declaration - definitions - repeal.
(3) There shall be added to the federal taxable income:
(u) (I) FOR THE 2026 INCOME TAX YEAR ONLY, the amount of any
overtime compensation excluded or deducted from federal gross income.
(II) THIS SUBSECTION (3)(u) IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE DECEMBER
31, 2032.
SECTION 2. Act subject to petition - effective date. (1) This
act takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly (August
12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13, 2026); except that, if a
referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the
state constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act
within such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect
unless approved by the people at the general election to be held in
November 2026 and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the
official declaration of the vote thereon by the governor.
-2- SB26-056